Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Municipal Planning Regulations

13-4-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Chief legislative body” means the chief legislative body of the municipality, whether designated board of aldermen, board of commissioners or by other title;

“Plat” includes plat, plan, plot or replot;

“Street” or “streets” means and includes streets, avenues, boulevards, roads, lanes, alleys and other ways; and

“Subdivision” means, in any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred sixty (32,760), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the division of a tract or parcel of land into two (2) or more lots, sites or other division of less than five (5) acres for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale or building development, and includes resubdivision and, when appropriate to the context, relates to the process of subdividing or to the land or area subdivided;

“Subdivision” means, in all counties except those in subdivision (4)(A), the division of a tract or parcel of land into two (2) or more lots, sites, or other divisions requiring new street or utility construction, or any division of less than five (5) acres, for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale or building development, and includes resubdivision and when appropriate to the context, relates to the process of resubdividing or to the land or area subdivided;

As used in subdivision (4)(B)(i), “utility construction” does not include the mere extension of individual service pipes or lines for the purpose of directly connecting a single lot, site or other division to existing utility mains.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.9 (Williams, § 3407.17); Acts 1976, ch. 831, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-601; Acts 1984, ch. 961, §§ 2-4; 1985, ch. 149, §§ 2, 3; 1986, ch. 679, § 1; 1988, ch. 597, § 2; 2008, ch. 746, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

“Subdivision” defined for regional planning regulation purposes, § 13-3-401.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

13-4-302. Submission of subdivision plats to commission for approval — Filing and recording.

From and after the time when the planning commission of any municipality shall have adopted a master plan which includes at least a major street plan, or shall have progressed in its master planning to the stage of the making and adoption of a major street plan, and shall have filed a certified copy of such major street plan in the office of the county register of the county in which the municipality is located, no plat of a subdivision of land lying within the municipality shall be filed or recorded until it shall have been submitted to and approved by the planning commission and such approval entered in writing on the plat by the secretary of the commission or by another designee of the planning commission; provided, that if the plat of subdivision divides the tract into no more than two (2) lots, then the approval may be endorsed in writing on the plat by the secretary of the commission or by another designee of the planning commission without the approval of the municipal planning commission, upon certification by the planning staff of the municipal planning commission that the subdivision complies with such regulations governing a subdivision of land as have been adopted by the municipal planning commission pursuant to § 13-4-303; and provided further, that no request for variance from such regulations has been requested.

No plat shall be submitted to or approved by the planning commission unless it is submitted by the owner of the property to be subdivided by the plat, or a governmental entity. “Owner,” for purposes of this section, means the legal or beneficial owner or owners of all the land proposed to be included in the proposed subdivision or the holder of a written option or contract to purchase the land, or the attorney or authorized representative of any of the aforementioned.

No county register shall file or record a plat of a subdivision of land, or an amendment, modification, or correction to a recorded plat of a subdivision, within the municipality without the approval of the planning commission as required by this part. Notwithstanding this subsection (c), an easement or survey attached to an easement granted to the state, a county, municipality, metropolitan government, or entity of the state, county, municipality or metropolitan government, shall not constitute an amendment, modification, or correction or a recorded plat of a subdivision.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-602; Acts 1988, ch. 554, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2002, ch. 593, § 1; 2004, ch. 576, § 3; 2006, ch. 644, §§ 2, 4, 6; 2010, ch. 625, § 1.

Cross-References. Adoption of plan, § 13-4-202.

Cooperative planning agreements, title 54, ch. 18, part 1.

General plan for physical development, § 13-4-201.

Plans for street and highway systems, title 54, ch. 18, part 2.

Regional planning commission platting authority — Standardizing lots — Recording plat by county register, § 13-3-402.

13-4-303. Subdivision regulations — Adoption.

In exercising the powers granted to it by this part, the planning commission shall adopt regulations governing the subdivision of land within the municipality. Such regulations may provide for the harmonious development of the municipality and its environs, for the coordination of streets within subdivisions with other existing or planned streets or with the plan of the municipality or of the region in which the municipality is located, for adequate open spaces for traffic, recreation, light and air, and for a distribution of population and traffic which will tend to create conditions favorable to health, safety, convenience and prosperity, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur.

As a condition precedent to the final approval of the plat, the regulations may include infrastructure improvement requirements as to the extent to which and the manner in which:

Roads are constructed and improved;

Water, sewer, and other utility mains, piping, and connections are constructed or installed; or

Other infrastructure and facilities are constructed or installed.

The regulations of the planning commission may provide for the preliminary approval of the plat before the infrastructure improvements, but any preliminary approval shall not be entered on the plat.

In lieu of the completion of the infrastructure improvements before the final approval of a subdivision plat, the planning commission may grant final plat approval subject to the submittal and acceptance of a bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance, in form, in amount, and with conditions and surety satisfactory to the planning commission. The bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall provide for and secure to the public and the local government the actual construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements within a period specified by the municipal planning commission and expressed in the bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance.

The attorney for the municipality shall enforce any bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance by all appropriate legal and equitable remedies, and moneys collected on the bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall be paid into the municipality's treasury. Upon the order of the planning commission, the moneys shall be applied to the construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements.

Before adoption of its subdivision regulations or any amendment thereof, a public hearing thereon shall be held by the commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-603; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 10; 2011, ch. 73, § 2; 2015, ch. 209, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Impact Fees in Tennessee, a Public and Private Partnership (Andrea C. Barach, Jane Pine Wood), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 685 (1988).

13-4-304. Procedure on submission of plats — Approval or disapproval — Contents — Hearings — Procedure in certain counties.

The commission shall approve or disapprove a plat within sixty (60) days after the initial consideration of the plat by the commission meeting in a regularly scheduled session, unless at the end of the sixty-day period there is a holiday or an unexpected interceding event that would close municipal or county offices and thus affect the normal computation of the sixty-day period, in which case the plat shall be approved or disapproved after the interrupted sixty-day period at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission; otherwise, the plat shall be deemed approved and a certificate to that effect shall be issued by the commission on demand. The applicant for the commission's approval may waive the time requirement set in this subsection (a) and consent to an extension or extensions of the applicable time period. When a plat has been filed with the appropriate officials of the planning commission, the plat shall be placed on the agenda of the planning commission within thirty (30) days of the filing or the next regularly scheduled planning commission meeting after the thirty-day period. The applicant may waive the time frame requirement for the appearance of the plat on the agenda.

The ground of disapproval of any plat shall be stated upon the records of the commission.

Any plat submitted to the commission shall contain the name and address of a person to whom notice of hearing shall be sent; and no plat shall be acted upon by the commission without affording a hearing thereon, notice of the time and place of which shall be sent by mail to such address not less than five (5) days before the date fixed for such hearing.

In counties having populations not less than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) nor more than four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, in the event the municipal planning commission approves or disapproves a plat after a hearing thereon, the applicant submitting the plat or any person who was a party for or against the plat request at the planning commission hearing shall have the right within thirty (30) days after such approval or disapproval to have the action of the municipal planning commission reviewed by the chief legislative body of the municipality having jurisdiction over zoning matters, who shall by majority vote approve or disapprove the plat. If the plat is approved, the secretary of the regional planning commission shall endorse the plat for recording as prescribed in § 13-3-402. No such plat shall be recorded until after the county court or other legislative body has acted on a request for a review of the action of the planning commission if there is a request within thirty (30) days.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-604; Acts 1973, ch. 402, § 2; 1993, ch. 312, § 1; 2007, ch. 137, § 1; 2009, ch. 34, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was amended by Acts 1973, ch. 402, § 2 with respect to Knox County only.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-4-305. Dedications — Effect of plat approval on status.

The approval of a plat shall not be deemed to constitute or effect an acceptance by the municipality, county or public of the dedication of any street or other ground shown upon the plat.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-605.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 839.

13-4-306. Transactions prohibited prior to obtaining approval of final subdivision plat — False representations as to construction of roads — Remedies — Requirements for final plat approval.

The owner or the agent of the owner of any land shall not:

Transfer, sell, agree to sell, or negotiate to sell the land by reference to, exhibition of, or by other use of a subdivision plat without first submitting a final subdivision plat to the municipal planning commission and receiving the commission's approval and before the final plat is recorded in the appropriate register's office; or

Falsely represent to a prospective purchaser of the land that roads or streets will be constructed by the municipality or other political subdivision.

The description by metes and bounds in the instrument of transfer or other document used in the sale or transfer does not exempt the transaction from a violation of this subsection (a). The municipality, through the municipal attorney or other official designated by the chief legislative body, may pursue an injunction or other appropriate remedy for a violation of this subsection (a).

The owner or agent of the owner of any land may sell, transfer, or agree to sell any lot or lots shown on a plat only after that plat has been given final plat approval by the planning commission, and after having been granted this final plat approval, the final plat is recorded in the office of the county register. The planning commission may grant final plat approval where the infrastructure improvements such as roads, water, sewer, utilities, other infrastructures, and facilities are not completed and accepted by the appropriate entities. For the planning commission to grant final approval, the owner or agent of the owner of the land to be granted final approval shall post a bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance in form, in amount, and with conditions and surety satisfactory to the planning commission. The bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall provide for and secure to the public and the municipality the actual construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements within a period specified by the planning commission.

The remedies and penalties provided by this chapter are to be applied exclusively to the owner or agent of the owner. Title to any tract conveyed without compliance with this chapter is not affected by this chapter unless the sale or transfer has been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction before the conveyance is recorded in the office of the appropriate county register. While the title to the tract is not affected by this chapter, the tract remains otherwise subject to this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-606; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2015, ch. 209, § 5.

13-4-307. Acceptance of and improvements of unapproved streets.

From and after the time when the platting jurisdiction of any municipal planning commission has attached as provided in § 13-4-302, the municipality shall not, nor shall any public authority, accept, lay out, open, improve, grade, pave, or light any street, or lay or authorize water mains or sewers or connections to be laid in any street within the municipality, unless such street shall have been accepted or opened as or shall have otherwise received the legal status of a public street prior to the attachment of the commission's subdivision jurisdiction, or unless such street corresponds in its location and lines with a street shown on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission or with a street plat made and adopted by the commission; provided, that the chief legislative body of the municipality may locate and construct or may accept any other street, provided the ordinance or other measure for such location and construction or for such acceptance is first submitted to the planning commission for its approval, and, if disapproved by the commission, be passed by a majority of the entire membership of the legislative body; and a street, approved by the planning commission upon such submission or constructed or accepted by such majority vote after disapproval by the commission, shall have the status of an approved street as fully as though it has been originally shown on a subdivision plat approved by the commission or on a plat made and adopted by the commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-607.

13-4-308. Prerequisites to granting building permit or erecting building — Public streets — Easements — Unlawful structures.

From and after the time when the platting jurisdiction of any municipal planning commission has attached as provided in § 13-4-302, no building permit shall be issued and no building shall be erected on any lot within the municipality, unless one (1) of the following circumstances is met:

The street giving access to the lot upon which the building is proposed to be placed has been accepted or opened as, or shall have otherwise received the legal status of, a public street prior to that time;

The street corresponds in its location and lines with a street shown on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission and recorded in the register of deeds;

Whenever the street or other infrastructure improvements as denoted on the plat have not been completed, there shall be an adequate, valid, and enforceable bond, or an adequate, valid, and enforceable other guarantee for the completion of the improvements, which shall be held by the appropriate officials as provided in § 13-4-303. This subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) shall not be construed to require duplicate bonds or to require additional bonds when an adequate bond to complete the infrastructure is already in effect. This subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) shall not be construed as requiring a building contractor to post the bond required by § 13-3-403 on the infrastructure for the subdivision if such building contractor is not a developer of the subdivision;

The lot fronts upon a permanent easement which conforms to all rules, regulations and specifications applicable to the permanent easement of the planning commission or other departments, divisions or agencies of the municipality and so long as the permanent easement has access to an existing highway, street, or thoroughfare, or with a street located or accepted by the chief legislative body of the municipality after submission to the planning commission and, in case of the commission's disapproval, by the favorable vote required in § 13-4-307; or

The street corresponds in its location and lines with a street shown on a street plat made and adopted by the commission.

The planning commission or other departments, divisions or agencies of a municipality, as approved by the planning commission, are authorized to adopt regulations to govern proposed permanent easements in proposed subdivisions as defined in § 13-4-301 and shall seek to ensure that the municipality shall not be responsible for future maintenance of such permanent easements.

Any building erected or to be erected in violation of this section shall be deemed an unlawful structure and the building commissioner or solicitor of the municipality or other official designated by the chief legislative body may bring action to enjoin such erection or cause it to be vacated or removed.

A building permit may be issued for a building to be located on a recorded lot of record as of April 21, 1987, which lot fronts on a permanent easement with access to an existing public street or road; provided, that any future subdivision of such lot shall be subject to subsection (a). If the municipality's zoning ordinance establishes a date or procedure by which a lot of record on an easement is recognized as a lot on which a building permit can be issued, then that date or procedure shall prevail over the aforementioned April 21, 1987 date.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-608; Acts 1986, ch. 891, §§ 1-4; 1987, ch. 216, § 1; 1990, ch. 911, § 1; 2014, ch. 914, § 3.

13-4-309. Special or private laws providing for municipal planning commission not repealed.

Nothing contained in this part shall be deemed to modify or supplant any provision of any special or private statute providing for a municipal planning commission; and the provisions of any such statute relating to the organization and powers of such commission and all other provisions of any such special or private statute shall remain in full force and effect; but insofar as this chapter grants powers to municipal planning commissions not contained in such special statute, the planning commission created and acting under such special statute shall be deemed to have the additional powers granted in this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 45, § 10; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3407.17 (Williams, § 3407.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-609.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 839.

13-4-310. Power of municipal planning commission to promulgate provisions for development — Vesting period for development standards as to approved development plans.

A municipal planning commission shall have the power to promulgate provisions in its subdivision regulations and recommend amendments to the zoning ordinance for the establishment of review and approval powers for site plans and the establishment under the zoning provisions for review and approval of planned unit developments, overlay districts, mixed use developments, condominiums and other types of sustainable design and development of property. The provision of well-designed and properly constructed infrastructure within such development is vital to the health, safety and welfare of the public utilizing said development and the community as a whole. These types of developments typically contain infrastructure that may be dedicated to a governmental entity or may be controlled by other types of bodies or nongovernmental entities including, but not limited to, property owner associations. These infrastructure and internal development improvements such as, but not limited to, public and nonpublic roads, water and sewer lines, landscaping, green space, sustainable design features and other improvements as required by the planning commission, either through its subdivision regulation or through the local government's zoning ordinance, shall be subject to bonding or other methods of guaranteeing their installation. The planning commission may set and hold these guaranteeing instruments or may designate to another governmental body that duty and function.

A vested property right shall be established with respect to any property upon the approval, by the local government in which the property is situated, of a preliminary development plan or a final development plan where no preliminary development plan is required by ordinance or regulation or a building permit allowing construction of a building where there was no need for prior approval of a preliminary development plan for the property on which that building will be constructed. During the vesting period described in subsections (c) and (d), the locally adopted development standards which are in effect on the date of approval of a preliminary development plan or the date of approval of a building permit, as described by this subsection (b), shall remain the development standards applicable to that property or building during the vesting period.

Unless an extension is granted by the local government, the vesting period applicable to an approved construction project for which a building permit has been issued shall begin on the date of issuance of the building permit by the local government and shall remain in effect for the time period authorized by the approved building permit, including any approved renewal obtained by the applicant prior to the expiration or termination of the permit to be renewed; provided, that the applicant pursues with reasonable diligence site preparation, if applicable, and construction.

The vesting period applicable to a development plan shall be a period of three (3) years, beginning on the date of the local government's approval of the preliminary development plan; provided, that the applicant obtains local government approval of a final development plan, secures any necessary permits and commences site preparation within the vesting period. If the applicant obtains local government approval of a final development plan, secures any necessary permits, and commences site preparation within the vesting period, then the vesting period shall be extended an additional two (2) years to commence construction from the date of the expiration of the three-year period. During the two-year period, the applicant shall commence construction and maintain any necessary permits to remain vested.

If construction commences during the vesting period, the development standards applicable during the vesting period shall remain in effect until the local government has certified final completion of the development or project; provided, the total vesting period for the project shall not exceed ten (10) years from the date of the approval of the preliminary development plan unless the local government grants an extension pursuant to an ordinance or resolution; provided further, that the applicant maintains any necessary permits during the ten-year period.

In the case of developments which proceed in two (2) or more sections or phases as described in the development plan, there shall be a separate vesting period applicable to each section or phase. The development standards which are in effect on the date of approval of the preliminary development plan for the first section or phase of the development shall remain the development standards applicable to all subsequent sections or phases of the development; provided, that the total vesting period for all phases shall not exceed fifteen (15) years from the date of the approval of the preliminary development plan for the first section or phase unless the local government grants an extension pursuant to an ordinance or resolution; provided further, that the applicant maintains any necessary permits during the fifteen-year period.

A local government may, by ordinance or resolution, specifically identify the type or types of development plans within the local government's jurisdiction that will cause property rights to vest; provided, that regardless of nomenclature used in the ordinance or resolution to describe a development plan, a plan which contains any of the information described in subdivision (k)(5) or (k)(6) shall be considered a development plan that will cause property rights to vest according to this section. Any such ordinance or resolution shall also specify what constitutes approval of a development plan within its jurisdiction. If a local government has not adopted an ordinance or resolution pursuant to this section specifying what constitutes a development plan that would trigger a vested property right, then rights shall vest upon the approval of any plan, plat, drawing, or sketch, however denominated, that is substantially similar to any plan, plat, drawing, or sketch described in subdivision (k)(5) or (k)(6).

During the vesting period described in subsections (c) and (d), the locally adopted development standards which are in effect on the date of approval of a preliminary development plan or the issuance of a building permit, whichever applies, shall remain the development standards applicable to the property described in such preliminary development plan or permit, except such rights shall terminate upon a written determination by the local government under the following circumstances pursuant to subdivision (f)(2):

When the applicant violates the terms and conditions specified in the approved development plan or building permit; provided, that the applicant is given ninety (90) days from the date of notification to cure the violation; provided further, that the local government may, upon a determination that such is in the best interest of the community, grant, in writing, an additional time period to cure the violation;

When the applicant violates any of the terms and conditions specified in the local ordinance or resolution; provided, the applicant is given ninety (90) days from the date of notification to cure the violation; provided further, that the local government may, upon a determination that such is in the best interest of the community, grant, in writing, an additional time period to cure the violation;

Upon a finding by the local government that the applicant intentionally supplied inaccurate information or knowingly made misrepresentations material to the issuance of a building permit or the approval of a development plan or intentionally and knowingly did not construct the development in accordance with the issued building permit or the approved development plan or an approved amendment for the building permit or the development plan; or

Upon the enactment or promulgation of a state or federal law, regulation, rule, policy, corrective action or other governance, regardless of nomenclature, that is required to be enforced by the local government and that precludes development as contemplated in the approved development plan or building permit, unless modifications to the development plan or building permit can be made by the applicant, within ninety (90) days of notification of the new requirement, which will allow the applicant to comply with the new requirement.

A written determination by the local government of the occurrence of any of the circumstances provided in subdivision (f)(1) shall cause the vested property rights to terminate; provided, however, that a local government may allow a property right to remain vested despite such a determined occurrence when a written determination is made that such continuation is in the best interest of the community.

A vested development standard shall not preclude local government enforcement of any development standard when:

The local government obtains the written consent of the applicant or owner;

The local government determines, in writing, that a compelling, countervailing interest exists relating specifically to the development plan or property which is the subject of the building permit that seriously threatens the public health, safety or welfare of the community and the threat cannot be mitigated within a reasonable period of time, as specified in writing by the local government, by the applicant using vested property rights;

Upon the written determination by the local government of the existence of a natural or man-made hazard on or in the immediate vicinity of the subject property, not identified in the development plan or building permit, and which hazard, if uncorrected, would pose a serious threat to the public health, safety, or welfare and the threat cannot be mitigated within a reasonable period of time, as specified in writing by the local government, by the applicant using vested property rights;

A development standard is required by federal or state law, rule, regulation, policy, corrective action, order or other type of governance that is required to be enforced by local governments, regardless of nomenclature; or

A local government is undertaking an action initiated or measure instituted in order to comply with a newly enacted federal or state law, rule, regulation, policy, corrective action, permit, order or other type of governance, regardless of nomenclature.

A vested property right does not preclude, change, amend, alter or impair the authority of a local government to exercise its eminent domain powers as provided by law.

This section shall not preclude, change, amend, alter or impair the authority of a local government to exercise its zoning authority, except a vested property right, once established as provided for in this section, precludes the effect of any zoning action by a local government which would change, alter, impair, prevent, diminish, or otherwise delay the development of the property, while vested, as described in an approved development plan or building permit.

In the event the local government enacts a moratorium on development or construction, the vesting period authorized pursuant to this section shall be tolled during the moratorium period.

An amendment to an approved development plan by the developer must be approved by the local government to retain the protections of the vested property right. An amendment may be denied based upon a written finding by the local government that the amendment:

Alters the proposed use;

Increases the overall area of the development;

Alters the size of any nonresidential structures included in the development plan;

Increases the density of the development so as to affect traffic, noise or other environmental impacts; or

Increases any local government expenditure necessary to implement or sustain the proposed use.

If an amendment is denied by the local government based upon such a written finding, then the applicant may either proceed under the prior approved plan with the associated vested property right or, alternatively, allow the vested property right to terminate and submit a new application under this section. Notwithstanding this subsection (h), a vested property right shall not terminate if the local government determines, in writing, that it is in the best interest of the community to allow the development to proceed under the amended plan without terminating the vested property right.

A local government shall not require an applicant to waive the applicant's vested rights as a condition of approval or as a consideration of approval of a development plan or the issuance of a building permit.

A vested property right shall attach to and run with the applicable property and shall confer upon the applicant the right to undertake and complete the development and use such property under the terms and conditions of a development plan, including any amendments thereto or under the terms and conditions of any building permit that has been issued with respect to the property.

As used in this section:

“Applicant” means a landowner or developer who is responsible for filing with the local government an application for a building permit, a development plan or application for a permit requisite to a development plan, or the representatives, assigns, successors, transferees, heirs or agents of such landowner or developer;

“Construction” means the erection of construction materials in a permanent position and fastened in a permanent manner. Where excavation, demolition or removal of an existing building has been substantially begun prior to rebuilding, such excavation, demolition or removal shall be deemed to be construction; provided, that work shall be carried on diligently and complies with all applicable requirements;

“Development plan” means both a preliminary development plan and a final development plan;

“Development standards”:

Means all locally adopted or enforced standards, regulations or guidelines applicable to the development of property, including, but not limited to, planning; local storm water requirements, layout, design; local construction standards for buildings, streets, alleys, curbs, sidewalks; zoning as provided for in subsection (g); lot size; lot configuration; yard dimensions; and off-site improvements, including public or private infrastructure, in which an applicant may acquire vested rights or vested property rights according to this section; and

Does not include standards required by federal or state law; or building construction safety standards which are adopted pursuant to authority granted under § 68-120-101;

“Final development plan” means a plan which has been submitted by an applicant and approved by a local government describing with reasonable certainty the type and intensity of use for a specific parcel or parcels of property. Such plan may be in the form of, but not be limited to, any of the following plans or approvals:

A planned unit development plan;

A subdivision plat;

General development plan;

Subdivision infrastructure construction plan;

Final engineered site plan; or

Any other land-use approval designation as may be utilized by a local government;

Unless otherwise expressly provided by the local government, such a plan shall include the boundaries of the site; significant topographical and other natural features affecting development of the site; the location on the site of the proposed buildings, structures, and other improvements; the dimensions, including height, of the proposed buildings and other structures or a building envelope; and the location of all existing and proposed infrastructure on the site, including water, sewer, roads, and pedestrian walkways. A variance shall not constitute a final development plan, and approval of a final development plan with the condition that a variance be obtained shall not confer a vested property right unless and until the necessary variance is obtained. Neither a sketch plan nor any other document which fails to describe with reasonable certainty the type of use, the intensity of use, and the ability to be served with essential utilities and road infrastructure for a specified parcel or parcels of property may constitute a final development plan;

“Preliminary development plan” means a plan which has been submitted by an applicant and that depicts a single-phased or multi-phased planned development typically used to facilitate initial public feedback and secure preliminary approvals from local governments. Examples of information found on development plans include proposed land uses, density and intensity of development, public utilities, road networks, general location of off-street parking, building location, number of buildable lots, emergency access, open space, and other environmentally sensitive areas such as lakes, streams, hillsides, and view sheds. An approved preliminary development plan serves as a guide for all future improvements within defined boundaries; and

“Site preparation” means excavating, grading, demolition, removing excess debris to allow for proper grading, or providing a surface for a proper foundation, drainage, and settling for a development project, and physical improvements including, but not limited to, water and sanitary sewer lines, footings, or foundations installed on the site for which construction permits are required.

Acts 2010, ch. 634, § 2; 2014, ch. 686, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to ensure stability and fairness in the land development process and the enactment of the Vested Property Rights Act of 2014, see Acts 2014, ch. 686.